Utah statutes.
58-26a-305.    Exemptions from licensure.
(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the
following may engage in acts included within the definition of the practice of
public accountancy, subject to the stated circumstances and limitations,
without being licensed under this chapter:
(a)  a person licensed by any other state, district, or territory of the
United States as a certified public accountant or its equivalent under any
other title while practicing in this state if:
(i)  the person's principal place of business is not in this state; and
(A)  the person's license as a certified public accountant is from any state
which the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy (NASBA) National
Qualification Appraisal Service has verified to be substantially equivalent to
the CPA licensure requirements of the Uniform Accountancy Act; or
(B)  the person's license as a certified public accountant is from a state
which the NASBA National Qualification Appraisal Service has not verified to
be substantially equivalent to the CPA licensure requirements of the Uniform
Accountancy Act and the person obtains from the NASBA National Qualification
Appraisal Service verification that the person's CPA qualifications are
substantially equivalent to the CPA licensure requirements of the Uniform
Accountancy Act and Subsection 58-26a-302(1)(d)(i); and
(ii)  the person consents, as a condition of the grant of this privilege:
(A)  to personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of
the division;
(B)  to comply with this chapter and the rules made under this chapter;
(C)  that in the event the license from the state of the person's principal
place of business becomes invalid, the person shall cease offering or
rendering professional services in this state both individually and on behalf
of the firm; and
(D)  to the appointment of the state board which issued the person's license
as the person's agent upon whom process may be served in an action or
proceeding brought by the division against the licensee;
(b)  through December 31, 2012, a person licensed by any other state,
district, or territory of the United States as a certified public accountant
or its equivalent under another title while practicing in this state if:
(i)  the person does not qualify for a practice privilege under Subsection
(1)(a);
(ii)  the practice is incidental to the person's regular practice outside of
this state; and
(iii)  the person's temporary practice within the state is in conformity with
this chapter and the rules established under this chapter;
(c)  an officer, member, partner, or employee of any entity or organization
who signs any statement or report in reference to the financial affairs of the
entity or organization with a designation of that person's position within the
entity or organization;
(d)  a public official or employee while performing his official duties;
(e)  a person using accounting or auditing skills, including the preparation
of tax returns, management advisory services, and the preparation of financial
statements without the issuance of reports; or
(f)  an employee of a CPA firm registered under this chapter or an assistant
to a person licensed under this chapter, working under the supervision of a
licensee, if:
(i)  neither the employee or assistant nor the licensed employer or registered
CPA firm represents that the unlicensed person is a certified public
accountant; and
(ii)  no accounting or financial statements are issued over the unlicensed
person's name.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who qualifies
under Subsection (1)(a) has all the privileges of a licensee of this state and
may engage in acts included within the definition of the practice of public
accountancy, whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic means,
based on a practice privilege in this state, and no notice, fee, or other
submission shall be provided by that person.
(b)  The division may revoke, suspend, or restrict an exemption granted under
Subsection (1)(a) or (b), or place on probation or issue a public or private
reprimand to a person exempted under those subsections for the reasons set
forth in Subsection 58-1-401(2).
